Maine, session 132, LD1860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Eligible to participate. Notwithstanding the requirements set forth in the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 3209-A, subsections 7 and 9, or any prior
eligibility determination, the distributed generation resources located in Ellsworth at 889
Bucksport Road and at interconnection queue number 148 and in Presque Isle at 14 State
Road at interconnection queue number 214 are eligible to participate in the net energy
billing program under Title 35-A, sections 3209-A and 3209-B, beginning on the date that
each project commences commercial operation.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.